Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2919
Herd or flock management plan, defined.

Herd or flock management plan means a written disease management plan that is designed by the herd owner or the owner's representative in conjunction with the State Veterinarian or federal area veterinarian in charge to eradicate or reduce exposure to a dangerous disease from an affected herd or flock. Such plan may require additional disease management practices deemed necessary by the State Veterinarian to eradicate such disease.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 19.